Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
In General

§ 43-7-1.
Department of Human Services to be Council on Aging.

The Department of Human Services shall be the Council on Aging and shall retain all powers and duties granted by law to the Council on Aging, and wherever the term “Council on Aging” appears in any law the same shall mean the Department of Human Services.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8960-01; Laws, 1964, ch. 441, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 104, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§§ 43-7-3 and 43-7-5.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 106, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§43-7-3. [Codes, 1942, § 8960-02; Laws, 1964, ch. 441, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, §§ 311, 312]

§43-7-5. [Codes, 1942, § 8960-03; Laws, 1964, ch. 441, § 3]

§ 43-7-7.
Duties of Department of Human Services.

The Department of Human Services shall be responsible for the collection of data and statistics and for making a continuing study of conditions affecting the general welfare of the aging population; for providing for an inter-agency and inter-departmental exchange of ideas; for encouraging and assisting in the development of programs for the aging in municipalities and counties of the state, including elder rights leadership; for cooperation with public and private agencies and departments in coordinating programs for the aging; for encouraging and promoting biological, physiological and sociological research; for making recommendations for residential housing and needed nursing and custodial care facilities.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8960-04; Laws, 1964, ch. 441, § 4; Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 105; Laws, 2017, ch. 344, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§§ 43-7-9 and 43-7-11.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1989, ch. 544, § 106, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§43-7-9. [Codes, 1942, § 8960-05; Laws, 1964, ch. 441, § 5]

§43-7-11. [Codes, 1942, § 8960-06; Laws, 1964, ch. 441, § 6; Laws, 1970, ch. 365, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 393, § 1]